Utah statutes.
78A-1-103.   Number of district judges.
The number of district court judges shall be:
(1)  four district judges in the First District;
(2)  14 district judges in the Second District;
(3)  28 district judges in the Third District;
(4)  13 district judges in the Fourth District;
(5)  five district judges in the Fifth District;
(6)  two district judges in the Sixth District;
(7)  three district judges in the Seventh District; and
(8)  two district judges in the Eighth District.
